Hawaii, session 2025, SB568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that populations of feral goats, sheep, and pigs have grown exponentially in the State, creating a wide range of problems for farmers, ranchers, property owners, users of transportation infrastructure, and many others. The legislature further finds that goats, sheep, and pigs are not native to Hawaii.  Therefore, like many other non-native organisms, they have disrupted native ecosystems that evolved for millions of years without these species present. Since goats and sheep were introduced to Hawaii in 1778, the populations of these species have grown to harmful levels.  Along with feral pigs, these species have destroyed native habitats by eating endangered and endemic plants.  This also disrupts the many species of native wildlife that rely on those native plants.  Goats, sheep, and pigs have also destroyed large proportions of native dryland forests, allowing invasive, non‑native grasses to overtake the landscape.  Some of these invasive grasses, such as Guinea grass, molasses grass, and buffelgrass, become highly flammable when dry and helped fuel the intense and fast-spreading 2023 Maui wildfires. Feral goats, sheep, and pigs also cause dangerous impacts beyond native forests.  Due in part to overpopulation, these animals have steadily ventured closer to highways and other roadways to find food and water.  These species frequently cross busy roads and even linger on highways to graze on grasses that protrude along cracks in the asphalt.  These behaviors pose significant dangers to drivers, who must quickly swerve or stop their vehicles to avoid collisions.  However, large trucks, especially those hauling trailers or carrying heavy loads, are often unable to make quick stops.  Similarly, motorcycles and scooters, which have a much longer stopping distance than cars and trucks, are prone to accidents caused by feral goats, sheep, and pigs.  Motorcycle and scooter operators are also more likely to suffer severe injury or death due to collisions. The legislature also finds that, as populations of goats, sheep, and pigs increase, individual animals become more likely to venture onto land where people live, work, and play.  This increases the likelihood of interactions with humans.  This is concerning because feral animals may attack humans who get too close, creating a risk to human life and welfare, particularly on residential properties adjacent to large, open areas such as fields and golf courses. The legislature further finds that feral goat, sheep, and pig populations negatively impact land, water, and marine resources. For example, overgrazing exposes loose dirt, which can easily become airborne during periods of high winds. The resulting dust storms are detrimental to the health of residents, especially those with asthma and other health conditions.  Similarly, debris and soil on overgrazed land easily run off into streams, causing slopes to lose stability and increasing the likelihood of landslides.  The runoff also damages downstream properties and nearshore waters and harms coral reefs and other native ecosystems. The legislature finds that populations of feral goats, sheep, and pigs may be managed by coordinated trapping.  A state-led coordinated trapping program would create safer roads; protect dryland forests from overgrazing; help feed underprivileged families and individuals; provide property owners, ranchers, and farmers with an ecologically friendly and herbicide‑free method of removing weeds and wildfire fuel; and provide a humane and pro-active way to manage populations of feral animals.  The legislature further finds that the department of land and natural resources, the agency with the most experience managing public lands and preserving native ecosystems, is the most appropriate agency to manage a trapping program. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish a program within the department of land and natural resources to coordinate the humane trapping of feral goats, sheep, and pigs in the State; and (2)  Designate the department of land and natural resources as the primary agency with responsibility for the trapping of feral goats, sheep, and pigs. SECTION 2.  Chapter 183D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§183D- Trapping of feral goats, sheep, and pigs.  (a)  The department, within its available appropriations, shall develop and maintain a program to humanely manage populations of feral goats, sheep, and pigs in the State by trapping.  The program shall include: (1)  Partnerships with agencies and private entities to increase the availability of and access to trapped feral goats, sheep, and pigs to be sold, donated, or consumed as wild game meat; (2)  Partnerships with state and county agencies to mitigate hazards from feral goats, sheep, and pigs on highways and other transportation infrastructure; (3)  Partnerships with state agencies and private entities to mitigate hazards from feral goats, sheep, and pigs on dryland forests and other public and private lands; (4)  Where appropriate, the use of trapped feral goats, sheep, and pigs to graze and browse for the purpose of grass and weed control; and (5)  The establishment or expansion of programs to educate property owners, ranchers, and farmers about services offered under the trapping program and benefits of allowing access to property for the trapping of feral goats, sheep, and pigs. (b) The department shall serve as the primary agency with responsibility for the trapping of feral goats, sheep, and pigs in the State and shall coordinate with other agencies for the trapping of feral goats, sheep, and pigs on public lands. (c)  As used in this section, "feral goats, sheep, and pigs" means goats, sheep, and pigs that are living in a wild or feral state and are not under domestication." SECTION 3.  Section 183D-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§183D-2 Powers and duties of department. The department shall: (1)  Manage and administer the wildlife and wildlife resources of the State; (2)  Enforce all laws relating to the protecting, taking, hunting, killing, propagating, or increasing the wildlife within the State and the waters subject to its jurisdiction; (3)  Recognize that: (A)  Game mammals and game birds provide a sustainable food source that merits high-quality habitats with sufficient food, water, and refuge to support viable populations sufficient for hunting; (B)  Proper management of game populations in appropriate areas minimizes the impacts of these populations and provides benefits to important watershed areas, including weed control and the reduction of grass fire fuel; and (C)  The State's unique relationship with the ocean requires careful consideration and management of land and ocean activities that prioritize the public trust responsibilities of the State, including the conservation of natural resources for future generations and the protection of native Hawaiian traditional and customary practices pursuant to article XI, section 1, and article XII, section 7, of the Hawaii State Constitution respectively; (4)  Establish and maintain wildlife propagating facility or facilities; (5)  Subject to the provisions of title 12, import wildlife for the purpose of propagating and disseminating the same in the State and the waters subject to its jurisdiction; (6)  Distribute, free of charge, as the department deems to be in the public interest, game for the purpose of increasing the food supply of the State; provided that when in the discretion of the department the public interest will not be materially interfered with by so doing, the department may propagate and furnish wildlife to private parties, upon any reasonable terms, conditions, and prices that the department may determine; (7)  Ascertain, compile, and disseminate, free of charge, information and advice as to the best methods of protecting, propagating, and distributing wildlife in the State and the waters subject to its jurisdiction; (8)  Gather and compile information and statistics concerning the area, location, character, and increase and decrease of wildlife in the State; (9)  Gather and compile information concerning wildlife recommended for release in different localities, including the care and propagation of wildlife for protective, productive, and aesthetic purposes and other useful information, which the department deems proper; (10)  Have the power to manage and regulate all lands [which] that may be set apart as game management areas, public hunting areas, and wildlife sanctuaries; (11)  Pursuant to section 183D-65 of this chapter, destroy predators deemed harmful to wildlife; (12)  Pursuant to section 183D- of this chapter, serve as the primary agency with responsibility for the trapping of feral goats, sheep, and pigs; [(12)] (13)  Formulate, and from time to time recommend to the governor and legislature, any additional legislation necessary or desirable to implement the objectives of title 12; and [(13)] (14)  Preserve, protect, and promote public hunting." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________